Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-279
Dissolution; distribution of assets.

(a) Upon the winding up of a limited partnership, the assets shall be distributed as follows:

(1) To creditors, including partners who are creditors, to the extent permitted by law, in satisfaction of liabilities of the limited partnership, whether by payment or by the making of reasonable provision for payment thereof, other than liabilities for distributions to partners under section 67-263 or 67-266;

(2) Except as provided in the partnership agreement, to partners and former partners in satisfaction of liabilities for distributions under section 67-263 or 67-266; and

(3) Except as provided in the partnership agreement, to partners first for the return of their contributions and secondly respecting their partnership interest, in the proportions in which the partners share in distributions.

(b) A limited partnership which has dissolved shall pay or make reasonable provision to pay all claims and obligations, including all contingent, conditional, or unmatured claims and obligations, known to the limited partnership and all claims and obligations which are known to the limited partnership but for which the identity of the claimant is unknown. If there are sufficient assets, such claims and obligations shall be paid in full and any such provision for payment made shall be made in full. If there are insufficient assets, such claims and obligations shall be paid or provided for according to their priority and, among claims and obligations of equal priority, ratably to the extent of assets available therefor. Unless otherwise provided in a partnership agreement, any remaining assets shall be distributed as provided in the Nebraska Uniform Limited Partnership Act. Any liquidating trustee winding up a limited partnership's affairs who has complied with this section shall not be personally liable to the claimants of the dissolved limited partnership by reason of such person's actions in winding up the limited partnership.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 47;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 50.